Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.4 Permanent Joint Committee on Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and
Other State Constructions

22-7.4-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on naming all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions to consist of seven (7) members of the general assembly, four (4) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker, not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party; three (3) of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate, not more than two (2) of whom shall be from the same political party. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original appointments. The members of the joint committee on naming all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions shall serve so long as they shall remain members of the house from which they were appointed and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 18; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 28.

22-7.4-2.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the joint committee, by majority vote, one of their members shall be chosen as chairperson, another of their members shall be chosen vice-chairperson, and another of their members shall be chosen as secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1.

22-7.4-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of this joint committee to name all new buildings, bridges, edifices and other state constructions.

To this end, the joint committee shall consult and counsel with the several agencies of the state and municipal government and any agencies of federal government and others that are now or may become concerned with, or responsible for the naming of any or all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions.

The joint committee is authorized to assist and cooperate with those state and other agencies concerned with the naming of any or all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1.

22-7.4-4.
Reports and recommendations.

The joint committee shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on their decisions on the names to be given to any and all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1.

22-7.4-5.
Technical assistance.

The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain the proper assistance from available sources, contract for any technical services that it shall require to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1.

22-7.4-6.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee, either initially or after action by other committees, all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting the naming of all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1.

22-7.4-6.1.
Reference of bills to state planning council.

Copies of bills referred to the committee pursuant to §

22-7.4-6

shall be sent to the division of planning of the department of administration at the time that the bills are referred to the committee. The secretary of state shall also provide the division of planning with copies of all bills referred to the committee which are enacted into law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 223, § 1.

22-7.4-7.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the joint committee on naming all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions; provided, that the joint committee on naming all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on naming all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state constructions shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 27, § 1.

22-7.4-8.
The Major-General Nathanael Greene Bridge.

The bridge in the town of Coventry, known as the Laurel Avenue Bridge, shall be named and known as the Major-General Nathanael Greene Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983 (S.S.), ch. 335, § 1.

22-7.4-9.
The Hugo L. Ricci, Sr. Memorial Bridge.

The bridge in the City of Providence, known as the Branch Avenue Bridge, shall be named and known as the Hugo L. Ricci, Sr. Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 8, § 1.

22-7.4-10.
The Doreen A. Tomlinson Memorial Fields.

The athletic fields in the city of Pawtucket at Daggett Avenue shall be named and known as the Doreen A. Tomlinson Memorial Fields.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 9, § 1.

22-7.4-11.
The Representative Aldo Freda Memorial Bridge.

The bridge in the city of Providence, known as the Atwells Avenue Bridge No. 775, shall be named and known as the Representative Aldo Freda Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 150, § 1.

22-7.4-12.
The Robert Paul Arrigan Memorial Sailing Facility.

The University of Rhode Island sailing facility, at Salt Pond, Narragansett, Rhode Island, shall be named and known as the Robert Paul Arrigan Memorial Sailing Facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 151, § 1.

22-7.4-12.1.
The Betty and Stephen Campanella Rowing Center.

The rowing center at the University of Rhode Island shall be named and known as the Betty and Stephen Campanella Rowing Center.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 3, § 1.

22-7.4-13.
The Gardner “Scup” Seveney State Highway Garage.

The state garage in the town of Portsmouth shall be named and known as the Gardner “Scup” Seveney State Highway Garage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 240, § 1.

22-7.4-14.
The A. Edgar Lussier Memorial Bridge.

The bridge in the city of Woonsocket, known as the Bernon Street Bridge, shall be named and known as the A. Edgar Lussier Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 240, § 1.

22-7.4-15.
The Harold Fell Field.

The baseball field at the Knight campus of the Community College of Rhode Island in the city of Warwick shall be named and known as the Harold Fell Field.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 256, § 1.

22-7.4-16.
The Henry H. Mackal Field House.

The field house facility on the Kingston campus of the University of Rhode Island in the town of South Kingstown shall be named and known as the Henry H. Mackal Field House.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 263, § 1.

22-7.4-17.
The Frank E. Furtado Building.

The facilities and maintenance building at the Narragansett Bay campus of the University of Rhode Island in the town of Narragansett shall be named and known as the Frank E. Furtado Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 264, § 1.

22-7.4-18.
The Albert E. Carlotti Building.

The administrative building on the Kingston campus of the University of Rhode Island in the town of South Kingstown shall be named and known as the Albert E. Carlotti Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 265, § 1.

22-7.4-19.
The Robert A. DeWolf Anatomy Laboratory.

The anatomy laboratory on the Kingstown campus of the University of Rhode Island in the town of South Kingstown shall be named and known as the Robert A. DeWolf Anatomy Laboratory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 268, § 1.

22-7.4-20.
The Chicoine House.

The group home located at 440 Nate Whipple Highway, Cumberland, R.I., shall be named and known as the Chicoine House.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 593, § 1.

22-7.4-21.
Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Bridge.

The bridge adjacent to the new train station over the relocated train tracks and the Woonasquatucket River south of the Capitol shall be named the Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 512, § 1.

22-7.4-22.
The Mildred L. LaBelle House.

The group home, located at 7233 Post Road, North Kingstown, Rhode Island, shall be named and known as the Mildred L. LaBelle House.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 221, § 1.

22-7.4-23.
1st Lieutenant Robert W. Lancaster Memorial Bridge.

The bridge located on Rt. 99 (the Woonsocket Lincoln Industrial Connector), crossing over the Blackstone River, and connecting the town of Lincoln with the town of Cumberland, shall be named and known as the 1st Lieutenant Robert W. Lancaster Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 423, § 1.

22-7.4-24.
The Florence Kerins Murray Court House.

The Newport County Court House shall be named and known as the Florence Kerins Murray Court House.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 451, §§ 1, 2.

22-7.4-25.
Vietnam Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.

The bridge in the town of Lincoln, located on Rhode Island highway number 99 and overpassing route 146, shall be named and known as the Vietnam Veterans’ Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 529, § 1.

22-7.4-26.
The Salty Brine State Beach.

Galilee State Beach in the town of Narragansett shall be named and known as the Salty Brine State Beach.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 7, § 1.

22-7.4-27.
The Joseph A. Russo Bridge.

The viaduct crossing the Blackstone River at Ashton in the towns of Cumberland and Lincoln, shall be named and known as the Joseph A. Russo Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 157, § 1.

22-7.4-28.
The William E. Powers Building.

The administration building, One Capitol Hill, located on Smith Street in the city of Providence shall be named and known as the William E. Powers Building in honor of William E. Powers, deceased associate justice of the Rhode Island Supreme Court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 141, § 1.

22-7.4-29.
Jack A. St. Jean Memorial Square.

The intersection of Hamlet Avenue, Bennett Street, Morton Avenue and Manville Road in the city of Woonsocket shall be known as the Jack A. St. Jean Memorial Square.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 387, § 1.

22-7.4-30.
John E. Fogarty Court Building.

The John E. Fogarty Federal Building in Providence shall be known as the John E. Fogarty Court Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 403, § 1.

22-7.4-31.
The James L. Baldwin Bridge.

The Boston Neck Road Bridge over route 138 (State Bridge No. 899) in the town of North Kingstown shall be named and known as the James L. Baldwin Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 410, § 1.

22-7.4-32.
The Samuel A. Engdahl Bridge.

The Stillwater Viaduct over the Woonasquatucket River (State Bridge No. 278) in the town of Smithfield shall be named and known as the Samuel A. Engdahl Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 83, § 1.

22-7.4-33.
John O. Pastore Public Broadcasting Center.

The Channel 36 studio and office building shall be known as the John O. Pastore Public Broadcasting Center.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 286, § 1.

22-7.4-34.
The John O. Pastore Center.

The complex of institutions, offices, and other facilities located in the city of Cranston and including without limitation the General Hospital, Institute of Mental Health, correctional facilities for adults, the Rhode Island Training School for Youth, inpatient detoxification facility, out-patient clinics, shelter for homeless persons, and administrative, program, training, and supporting activities shall be renamed and known as the John O. Pastore Center, a succinct title that conveys the historic character of the area and encompasses the many diverse departments, functions, and activities located there focused upon improving the human condition and further recognizes Governor and United States Senator John O. Pastore, as a great humanitarian and a friend of the common man, who made an immeasurable contribution to the city of Cranston and to the state of Rhode Island.

The inventory of state-owned buildings maintained by the capital development planning and oversight commission, as provided for by §

35-3-7.2

, shall constitute a uniform system for designating and identifying buildings and other structures at the John O. Pastore Center. No other system shall be used for this purpose, either in documents or records prepared by state agencies, or on the buildings or other structures themselves, except for names adopted in accordance with this chapter.

Streets shall be named by resolution of the joint committee on naming all new buildings, bridges, edifices, and other state construction as provided for by §

22-7.4-3(a)

. Those names, as they may be approved or revised from time to time by the joint committee, shall appear on a map approved and amended from time to time by the joint committee. This map shall be maintained by the division of planning in the department of administration. No street named in accordance with this subsection shall duplicate or resemble a street name of a public street in the city of Cranston.

The division of planning in the department of administration is authorized to prepare a system of building addresses for the John O. Pastore Center. Upon approval of that system by the city of Cranston and the 911 authority, the joint committee may adopt the system, and amend it from time to time as necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 35, § 1.

22-7.4-35.
The Forman Center.

The building on the campus of Rhode Island College known as the Stone Building shall be named and known as the Forman Center in honor of Sylvan Forman.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 8, § 1.

22-7.4-36.
The Iwo Jima Memorial Highway.

The highway known as the Route 99 connector in Woonsocket, which will link Route 146 in Lincoln to the Highland II Corporate Park in Cumberland, shall be named and known as the Iwo Jima Memorial Highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 11, § 1.

22-7.4-37.
The Ralph L. Rathier Bridge.

The Stillwater Road Bridge over the Woonasquatucket River (State bridge No. 949) in the town of Smithfield shall be named and known as the Ralph L. Rathier Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 12, § 1.

22-7.4-38.
The Professor Emeritus Foster H. Middleton Building.

The building on the Narragansett Bay campus of the University of Rhode Island known as the OE-I (South Laboratory Building) shall be named the Professor Emeritus Foster H. Middleton Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 13, § 1.

22-7.4-39.
The Professor Emeritus Herman E. Sheets Building.

The building on the Narragansett Bay campus of the University of Rhode Island known as the OE-II (Wave Tank Building) shall be named the Professor Emeritus Herman E. Sheets Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 16, § 1.

22-7.4-40.
Amaral Brothers Bridge.

The Barrington Parkway Bridge (State Bridge 151) in the city of East Providence shall be named and known as the Amaral Brothers Bridge, in honor of Manuel, Horace, Eugene, David and George Amaral, who all served in the United States Navy during World War II.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 20, § 1.

22-7.4-41.
The Peter J. O’Connell Building.

The building housing the headquarters of the Rhode Island state lottery and located at 1425 Pontiac Avenue in the city of Cranston shall be known as the Peter J. O’Connell Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 79, § 1.

22-7.4-42.
The Joseph F. Lambert Memorial Little League Field.

The third little league field located at the John T. Owens Memorial Field located on Niantic Avenue in the city of Providence shall be named and known as the Joseph F. Lambert Memorial Little League Field.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 2, § 1.

22-7.4-43.
The Patrick F. McNamara Bridge.

The bridge on Pawtucket Avenue in East Providence shall be named and known as the Patrick F. McNamara Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 33, § 1.

22-7.4-44.
The Gloria DiSandro McDonald Building.

The building known as the women’s facility at the adult correctional institution building, No. 47, at 13 Fleming Road, Cranston, RI shall be named and known as the Gloria DiSandro McDonald Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 49, § 1.

22-7.4-45.
The John J. Moran Facility.

The building known as the new men’s medium security facility at the adult correctional institution shall be named and known as the John J. Moran Facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 278, § 1.

22-7.4-46.
The Chester H. Kirk Complex.

The buildings known as the new Engineering Complex at the University of Rhode Island shall be named and known as the Chester H. Kirk Complex.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 209, § 1.

22-7.4-47.
The Bruce Sundlun Terminal Building.

The airport terminal building at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport in the city of Warwick shall be named and known as the Bruce Sundlun Terminal Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 6, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 6, effective June 1, 2021.

22-7.4-48.
The John Eldred Parkway.

The section of the highway known as Route 138 which runs between the Jamestown-Verrazzano Bridge and the Newport-Pell Bridge in the town of Jamestown shall be named and known as the John Eldred Parkway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 290, § 1.

22-7.4-48.1.
The Mary Brennan Parkway.

The highway known as the airport connector in Warwick shall be named and known as the Mary Brennan Parkway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 12, § 1.

22-7.4-49.
The Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway.

The entire length of Interstate 295 in Rhode Island shall be named The Korean War Veterans Memorial Highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 11, § 1.

22-7.4-50.
The Peter D’Abrosca Bridge.

The bridge in the town of North Kingstown, known as the Hunts River Bridge, shall be named and known as the Peter D’Abrosca Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 40, § 1.

22-7.4-51.
The C. Richard Skogley Turfgrass Research Center.

The building on the Kingston campus of the University of Rhode Island known as Building 350 shall be named the C. Richard Skogley Turfgrass Research Center.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 43, § 1.

22-7.4-52.
The Donald Price Facility.

The building known as the Medium II Correctional Facility shall be named and known as The Donald Price Facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 297, § 1.

22-7.4-53.
The John Nazarian Facility.

The building known as the Performing Arts Classroom Facility at Rhode Island College shall be named and known as The John Nazarian Center for the Performing Arts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 16, § 1.

22-7.4-54.
James J. Federico, Jr. State Beach Pavilion.

The Misquamicut State Beach Pavilion in the town of Westerly shall be named and known as the James J. Federico, Jr. State Beach Pavilion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 390, § 1.

22-7.4-55.
The Louis Alfano Building.

The building called the South Building located at the Rhode Island Veterans’ Home in Bristol shall be named and known as the Louis Alfano Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 380, § 1.

22-7.4-56.
The Orlando Bisbano Building.

The building at the Rhode Island Veterans’ Home in Bristol known as the North Building shall be named and known as The Orlando Bisbano Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 381, § 1.

22-7.4-57.
The Amvets Memorial Highway.

The highway known as Route 95 from the Connecticut border to the Massachusetts border shall be named and known as the Amvets Memorial Highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 385, § 1.

22-7.4-58.
Bruce Sundlun Road.

The access road to Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport from Post Road (U.S. Route 1) to the airport terminal in the city of Warwick shall be named and known as the Bruce Sundlun Road.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 6, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 6, effective June 1, 2021.

22-7.4-59.
Citizens Square and Ferrante Square.

One half of the intersection of Hartford Avenue and Atwood Avenue located on the eastern side of Route 6 shall be known as Citizens Square; the other half of the intersection located on the western side of Route 6 shall be known as Ferrante Square.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 295, § 1.

22-7.4-60.
Manton Village Bridge.

The bridge known as the Manton Avenue Bridge 78 shall be named and known as the Manton Village Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 515, § 1.

22-7.4-61.
The Edward J. Liston Campus.

The facility known as the Providence campus of the Community College of Rhode Island in Providence shall be named and known as the Edward J. Liston Campus.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 19, § 1.

22-7.4-62.
Preston S. and Ann V. Babbitt Memorial Wildlife Refuge.

That parcel of land comprised of thirty-two and seven hundred sixty-seven thousandths (32.767) acres, more or less, situated on the westerly side of Main Road and Old Main Road in the town of Tiverton, and shown on that plan entitled “Survey Plan Showing Block 120, Lot 9A, Main Road, Tiverton, Rhode Island, Scale 1 inch = 100 feet, September 9, 1999,” by Marc N. Nyberg Associates, Inc., and more particularly described in Exhibit “A” to the warranty deed accepted and subscribed on behalf of the state of Rhode Island and Providence Plantations department of environmental management on December 16, 1999, shall be named and known as the Preston S. and Ann V. Babbitt Memorial Wildlife Refuge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 132, § 1.

22-7.4-63.
The Thomas H. Byrnes, Jr. Bike Path.

The section of the East Bay Bike Path located in the towns of Barrington, Warren, and Bristol shall be named and known as the Thomas H. Byrnes, Jr. Bike Path.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 471, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 82, § 1.

22-7.4-64.
George Sears Greene Memorial Bridge.

The bridge known as the Apponaug Artic Bridge #3 shall be named and known as the George Sears Greene Memorial Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 489, § 1.

22-7.4-65.
Judge Paul Del Nero District Courtroom.

The district courtroom in the Newport County Courthouse, also known as the Florence Murray Judicial Complex, shall be named and known as the Judge Paul Del Nero Courtroom.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 93, § 1.

22-7.4-66.
American Legion Highway.

The section of Route 4 between Route 95 and Route 1 shall be known as the American Legion Highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 94, § 1.

22-7.4-67.
Upper Pond Drive.

The Colonel Oliver Hazard Perry Access Road shall be named and known as Upper Pond Drive.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 96, § 1.

22-7.4-68.
John E. Rebello Memorial Bridge and Tunnel.

The bridge known as Bridge # 451 shall be named and known as the John E. Rebello Memorial Bridge and Tunnel.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 403, § 1.

22-7.4-69.
The John H. Chafee Transportation Operations and Maintenance Center.

The Rhode Island public transit authority’s Elmwood Facility shall be named and known as the John H. Chafee Transportation Operations and Maintenance Center.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 146, § 1.

22-7.4-70.
The William Bruce Richardson and Ronald E. Blake Memorial Traffic Island.

The traffic island at the intersection of Greenville Avenue and Atwood Avenue in the town of Johnston shall be named and known as the William Bruce Richardson and Ronald E. Blake Memorial Traffic Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 300, § 1.

22-7.4-71.
The Ann Gall Durbin Aquarium Building.

The Aquarium Building at the University of Rhode Island’s Narragansett Bay campus shall be named the Ann Gall Durbin Aquarium Building.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 351, § 1.

22-7.4-72.
The Eddie Dowling Highway.

Route 146, in its entirety, shall be named and known as the Eddie Dowling Highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 356, § 1.

22-7.4-73.
Louis Jagschitz State Pier.

The state pier located at Washington street in the city of Newport will be named the “Louis Jagschitz State Pier.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 77, § 2.

22-7.4-74.
The Bradford R. Boss Ice Arena.

The new ice facility on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island shall be named the “Bradford R. Boss Ice Arena.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 151, § 1.

22-7.4-75.
The Vincent Cullen Fieldhouse.

The fieldhouse of the Knight Campus of the Community College of Rhode Island will be named the “Vincent Cullen Fieldhouse”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 154, § 1.

22-7.4-76.
The Thomas M. Ryan Convocation Center.

The new convocation center on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island shall be named the “Thomas M. Ryan Convocation Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 152, § 1.

22-7.4-77.
Lincoln Almond Plaza and Robert Weygand Plaza.

The newly constructed area from Tootell Road to West Alumni Avenue on the north side of the Kingston campus of the University of Rhode Island will be named the “Lincoln Almond Plaza.” The south plaza of the Convocation Center on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island will be named the “Robert Weygand Plaza.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 153, § 1.

22-7.4-78.
The Blount Aquaculture Research Facility.

The new aquaculture research facility at the Narragansett Bay Campus of the University of Rhode Island shall be named the “Blount Aquaculture Research Facility.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 156, § 1.

22-7.4-79.
Frank Newman Hall.

The facility located at 14 Upper College Road on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island shall be named the “Frank Newman Hall.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 170, § 1.

22-7.4-80.
Heidi Kirk Duffy International Engineering House.

The facility located at 61 Upper College Road on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island formerly occupied by the Chi Phi fraternity will be named the “Heidi Kirk Duffy International Engineering House.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 169, § 1.

22-7.4-81.
William C. O’Neill Bike Path.

The South County bike path in the towns of Narragansett and South Kingstown shall hereafter be named and known as the “William C. O’Neill Bike Path.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 199, § 1.

22-7.4-82.
Veterans’ Way.

The section of Route 78 in Westerly shall hereafter be named and known as “Veterans’ Way.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 376, § 1.

22-7.4-83.
The Murray Center.

The Rhode Island College Health, Physical Education and Athletic Complex shall hereafter be named and known as “The Murray Center” in honor of Mary and Catherine Murray.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 4, § 1.

22-7.4-84.
The Gladys Carr Bolhouse Connector Road.

The section of road between America’s Cup Avenue and Washington Street in the city of Newport, formerly known as the Goat Island Connector Road, shall be named and known as the “Gladys Carr Bolhouse Connector Road.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 51, § 1.

22-7.4-85.
The John H. Chafee Research Vessel.

The new research vessel recently constructed for the Rhode Island Department of Environmental Management, Division of Fish and Wildlife, shall hereafter be named and known as “The John H. Chafee.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 149, § 1.

22-7.4-86.
Joseph F. Kauffman Center.

The building previously known as Building 10 on the Rhode Island College Campus shall be hereafter named and known as the “Joseph F. Kauffman Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 19, § 1.

22-7.4-87.
The Charles E. Maynard Building.

The building located at 520 Hope Street in the city of Providence shall be named and known as the “Charles E. Maynard Building.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 133, § 1.

22-7.4-88.
The Garden of Heroes.

The garden section on the southwest lawn of the Rhode Island State House, originally constructed for the motion picture “Amistad” shall hereafter be referred to as “The Garden of Heroes.” This area shall be dedicated to any Rhode Island resident who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any member of the Rhode Island National Guard who is killed or who dies, whether it be through state or federal service, while serving in the war against terror, or any United States military action since September 11, 2001.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 134, § 1.

22-7.4-89.
Veterans’ Memorial Highway.

The portion of Route 2, running between the junction of Route 2 and Route 102 south and up to the junction of Route 2 and Route 138, shall hereafter be named and be known as the “Veterans’ Memorial Highway.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 218, § 1.

22-7.4-90.
The Dr. Ando Suvari Long-Term Care Center.

The Long-Term Care Program, and Hospital wards associated therewith, located at the Rhode Island Institute of Mental Health shall hereafter be named and known as “The Dr. Ando Suvari Long-Term Care Program” and “The Dr. Ando Suvari Long-Term Care Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 234, § 1.

22-7.4-91.
The Zeke Harris Corner.

The intersection of Davisville Road and Old Baptist Road in the town of North Kingstown shall be named and known as “The Zeke Harris Corner.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 259, § 1.

22-7.4-92.
Paul V. Sherlock Center for Disabilities.

That building formerly known as the DCYF building on the Rhode Island College Campus shall hereafter be known and named as the “Paul V. Sherlock Center for Disabilities.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 342, § 1.

22-7.4-93.
The Lance Corporal Victor Patrick Andreozzi and Vietnam Veterans Bridge.

The bridge in the town of Barrington that runs over County Road (Route 114), previously known as the Barrington Bridge, shall hereafter be named and known as The Lance Corporal Victor Patrick Andreozzi and Vietnam Veterans Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 277, § 1.

22-7.4-94.
The George Redman Linear Park.

The future Washington Bridge Linear Park in the city of East Providence shall be named and known as the “George Redman Linear Park.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 155, § 1.

22-7.4-95.
The Fred Lippitt Woonasquatucket River Greenway.

The section of bike path known as the Woonasquatucket River Greenway, that travels through the Providence portion of the Woonasquatucket River Greenway to the Johnston town line, shall hereafter be named as the “Fred Lippitt Woonasquatucket River Greenway.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 276, § 1.

22-7.4-96.
The Joseph ‘Jay’ P. Kirwin Rugby Pitch.

The North Athletic Field Rugby Pitch located in Fort Adams State Park shall be named and known as “The Joseph ‘Jay’ P. Kirwin Rugby Pitch.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 473, § 1.

22-7.4-97.
Captain Matthew J. August Memorial Bridge.

The newly constructed Davisville Road Bridge, (Bridge #1008) over relocated Route 403 in North Kingstown shall be named and known as the “Captain Matthew J. August Memorial Bridge.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 570, § 1.

22-7.4-98.
Texas Instruments House.

The second International Engineering Program (IEP) building on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island, formerly known as the Chi Phi Fraternity, shall be named and known as the “Texas Instruments House.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 195, § 1.

22-7.4-99.
Wiley Hall.

The new residence hall located on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island known as North Woods Residence B, shall hereafter be named and known as “Wiley Hall” in honor of Alton Wiley, the first African-American Judge in Rhode Island, George Wiley, an American Chemist and Civil Rights Leader, and Beverly Wiley, a community leader; and in recognition of their many and varied contributions to the Nation, the State of Rhode Island, and the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 201, § 1.

22-7.4-100.
Fire Fighters Memorial Square.

The section of Route 108, between the intersection of Route 108 and Columbia Road, and the intersection of Route 108 and North Road, located in the Town of South Kingstown, shall hereafter be named and known as “Fire Fighters Memorial Square.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 197, § 1.

22-7.4-101.
Eddy Hall.

The new residence hall located on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island known as the West Side Suites, shall hereafter be named and known as “Eddy Hall” in honor of Edward D. Eddy, the ninth President of the University of Rhode Island, and in recognition of his contributions to the State of Rhode Island and the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 200, § 1.

22-7.4-102.
The Sgt. Timothy R. Giblin Highway.

The section of US Route 6, that travels between Hartford Avenue and Killingly Street in the city of Providence, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Sgt. Timothy R. Giblin Highway” in honor of Sgt. Timothy R. Giblin, a proud and valiant United States Marine, who served this country with honor and distinction, and died in the line of duty on October 23, 1983 in the Beirut barracks bombing during the Lebanese Civil War.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 196, § 1.

22-7.4-103.
Garrahy Hall.

The new residence hall located on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island known as North Woods Residence A, shall hereafter be named and known as “Garrahy Hall” in honor of J. Joseph Garrahy, former Governor of the State of Rhode Island, in recognition of his contributions to the State of Rhode Island and support of the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 202, § 1.

22-7.4-104.
Charles “Ted” Wright Rotary.

The rotary located at the intersection of Kingstown Road and Old Point Judith Road in the town of Narragansett shall be named and known as the Charles “Ted” Wright Rotary.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 351, § 1.

22-7.4-105.
The Roosevelt Benton Youth Assessment Center.

The building formerly known as the Juvenile Detention Center, located in the Pastore Complex on Cherrydale Court in Cranston, Rhode Island, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Roosevelt Benton Youth Assessment Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 90, § 1.

22-7.4-106.
Swan Hall.

The classroom building on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island, formerly known as Independence Hall, shall be named and known as “M. Beverly Swan Hall.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 15, § 1.

22-7.4-107.
Ginsu Way.

The unnamed street located in the city of Warwick, Rhode Island on the westerly side of Bald Hill Road and at that certain location known as 1775 Bald Hill Road, shall hereinafter be named and known as “Ginsu Way.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 136, § 1.

22-7.4-108.
Robert L. Carothers Library.

The library building on the Kingston Campus of the University of Rhode Island shall be named and known as the “Robert L. Carothers Library.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 8, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 9, § 1.

22-7.4-109.
The Governor Philip W. Noel Judicial Complex.

The new Kent County Courthouse located in Warwick, Rhode Island, shall hereafter be named and known as “The Governor Philip W. Noel Judicial Complex.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 90, § 1.

22-7.4-110.
The Anthony P. Travisono Building.

The Department of Corrections Intake Service Center shall hereafter be named and known as “The Anthony P. Travisono Building” in honor of Anthony P. Travisono, our state’s first Director of Corrections, whose reputation for innovation and excellence in correctional and management programming is international, and who went on to become the Executive Director of the American Correctional Association.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 325, § 1.

22-7.4-111.
The Thomas C. Slater Training School.

The facility known as the Rhode Island Training School in the city of Cranston, consisting of the Roosevelt Benton Youth Assessment Center, a youth development center, and a female unit, shall hereafter be named and known as “The Thomas C. Slater Training School” in honor of Rhode Island State Representative Thomas C. Slater in recognition of his many and varied contributions to the facility and the State of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 2, § 1.

22-7.4-112.
Leslie Cameron Greenhouse.

The greenhouse building located at Rhode Island College, 600 Mt. Pleasant Avenue, Providence, Rhode Island, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Leslie Cameron Greenhouse” in honor of Leslie Cameron, Rhode Island College Class of 1970, who provided funding for the renovation of this facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 177, § 1.

22-7.4-113.
Anna Fascitelli Fitness and Wellness Center.

The Roger Williams Dining Commons building located in the middle of the residential sector of campus at the University of Rhode Island in Kingston, shall hereafter be named and known as the “Anna Fascitelli Fitness and Wellness Center.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 44, § 1.

22-7.4-114.
Robert J. McKenna Boulevard.

The section of pedestrian roadway, within Fort Adams State Park, from the Fort Adams Visitor’s Center, along the North perimeter, to the West Gate, shall be named and known as the “Robert J. McKenna Boulevard.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 183, § 1.

22-7.4-115.
Alex and Ani Hall.

The building on the Rhode Island College campus in Providence originally known as the Student Center and, since 1976, as the Art Center, shall hereafter be named and known as “Alex and Ani Hall.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 237, § 1.

22-7.4-116.
Roberta Richman Way.

The unnamed street located in the city of Cranston, Rhode Island on the easterly side of Howard Avenue and extending to West Road and located adjacent to Margaret Walsh Park shall herein after be named and known as “Roberta Richman Way.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 359, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 379, § 2.

22-7.4-117.
Paul Bettencourt Fish Ladder.

The fish ladder located on Omega Pond in the city of East Providence shall be named the “Paul Bettencourt Fish Ladder.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 480, § 1.

22-7.4-118.
The Frank Beazley Building.

The Wallum Lake Building located at 2090 Wallum Lake Road on the campus of the Eleanor Slater Hospital/Zambarano Unit, in the town of Pascoag shall hereafter be named and known as “The Frank Beazley Building.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 17, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 18, § 2.

22-7.4-119.
J. Clement Cicilline Community Mental Health Center Building.

The building located at 65 Valley Road in Middletown, known as the Newport County Community Mental Health Center shall hereafter be named and known as the “J. Clement Cicilline Community Mental Health Center Building.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 147, § 1.